North Carolina, session 2025, HB968.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 7. Instructional Requirements.
"§ 115C-76.80. Instructional requirements.
Each public school unit shall provide instruction pursuant to the requirements of this Part.
"§ 115C-76.85. Emergency preparedness education.
(a) Instruction shall be provided in emergency preparedness from kindergarten through
high school. The State Board of Education shall adopt standards for instruction in emergency
preparedness, differentiated between elementary school, middle school, and high school.
(b) Standards for elementary school instruction shall begin not before grade three and
include at least the following:
(1) Education on man-made and natural disasters.
(2) Roles of various parties during disasters, such as (i) students, (ii) teachers, and
(iii) first responders.
(3) The emergency response plan of the school or local school administrative unit
and any supplies that are available in accordance with the emergency response
plan.
(c) Standards for middle school instruction shall include at least the following:
(1) Updated instruction from the elementary school standards to reflect any
changes that have occurred or to reflect the student's new school placement.
(2) Completion of a project researching a past disaster, whether natural or
man-made.
(3) Responses to mass casualty events, including the different types of mass
casualty events.
(4) Education on electrical hazards and how to exert proper care around electrical
sources.
(d) Standards for high school instruction shall include at least the following:
(1) Updated instruction from the elementary school and middle school standards
to reflect any changes that have occurred or to reflect the student's new school
placement.
*H968-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Introduction to the material in the Community Emergency Response Team
(CERT) Basic Training Manual issued by the Federal Emergency
Management Agency.
(e) Local school administrative units shall determine the appropriate courses during
which instruction pursuant to this section shall be provided."
SECTION 1.(b) Part 1 of Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-81.67. Emergency preparedness.
Each local board of education shall develop and implement emergency preparedness
instruction consistent with the requirements of G.S. 115C-76.85."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 4 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 116-69.05. Informational literacy.
The school shall provide instruction in emergency preparedness consistent with
G.S. 115C-76.85."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 116-235(a1) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(1a) The Board of Trustees shall ensure that instruction in emergency preparedness
consistent with G.S. 115C-76.85 is included in the standard course of study
for the School."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 968-First Edition